District of Columbia statutes.
34-501

Creation of liens on property of utilities; supervision by Commission.

The power to create liens on corporate property by public utilities in the District of Columbia is hereby declared to be a special privilege, the right of supervision, regulation, restriction, and control of which is hereby vested in the Public Service Commission of the District of Columbia, and such power shall be exercised according to the provisions of this subtitle.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 990, ch. 150, § 8, par. 72
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-701.
1973 Ed., § 43-801.